Maine, session 132, LD2158.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Temporary appointment of members to Knox County budget
committee. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary in the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 30-A, section 751 or in the Knox County charter regarding the election of
members to the Knox County budget committee and the filling of vacancies on the Knox
County budget committee, the following provisions apply.
1. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
Page 1 - 132LR2961(03)

A. "Budget committee" means the Knox County budget committee established in Title
30-A, section 751.
B. "County commissioners" means the county commissioners of Knox County.
C. "District" means the budget committee districts established in Title 30-A, section
757, subsection 2.
D. "Eligible resident" means an individual registered to vote in Knox County who is a
resident of the district for which that individual is nominated and elected.
2. Appointment of eligible residents. The county commissioners may appoint an
eligible resident to fill a vacancy on the budget committee when there are fewer than 5
members of the budget committee who have been duly elected or who have been appointed
pursuant to this subsection and seated.
3. Candidates recommended by municipalities. Notwithstanding Title 30-A,
section 751, subsection 1, paragraph B, a municipality may submit a written
recommendation identifying an eligible resident to fill a vacancy on the budget committee.
The county commissioners shall give due regard to such a recommendation when making
an appointment to the budget committee pursuant to subsection 2.
4. Term of appointed members. A member of the budget committee appointed to
fill a vacancy pursuant to this section fills the vacant seat for the balance of the unexpired
term.
5. Voting status of appointed members. A member of the budget committee
appointed to fill a vacancy pursuant to this section is a full voting member of the budget
committee.
6. Authority to fill vacant seats when quorum exists unaffected. This section does
not affect the requirement in Title 30-A, section 751, subsection 1, paragraph D that the
budget committee fill a vacancy occurring on the budget committee when it has a quorum
to act.
7. Termination of authority. The authority granted in this Act expires December 31,
2028.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2961(03)